Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-535
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-535 to 76-558 shall be known and may be cited as the Abstracters Act.

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 5.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).